Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF841.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin EMERGENCY FOOD SHELF PROGRAMS; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2025 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of children, youth, and families for food shelf programs under Minnesota Statutes, section 142F.14. This is a onetime emergency appropriation with the intent to distribute as quickly as possible and is available until June 30, 2026. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end